test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AL_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - sg̲ál - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AL_STEM_1

     sg̲ál+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: sg̲ál
     sg̲ál+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲álga
     sg̲ál+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲ál
     sg̲ál+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲álgang
     sg̲ál+V+DIRECT+PAST: sg̲álgan
     sg̲ál+V+RELATIVE: sg̲áls
     sg̲ál+V+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲álang
     sg̲ál+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲álgang
     sg̲ál+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲álganggang
     sg̲ál+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲álgangang
     sg̲ál+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲álgiinii
     sg̲ál+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲álgaangaa
     sg̲ál+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲álgaangaan
     sg̲ál+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sg̲áläsaa
     sg̲ál+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sg̲áläs
     sg̲ál+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sg̲áläsaang
     sg̲ál+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sg̲áläsga
     sg̲ál+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲áläsaas
     sg̲ál+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲áläsaa.ang
     sg̲ál+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲álang k̲asa'áa
     sg̲ál+V+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲álang k̲asa'áang
     sg̲ál+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲álang k̲asaasdláa
     sg̲ál+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲álang k̲asaasdláang
     sg̲ál+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'uuj
     sg̲ál+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'uujang
     sg̲ál+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sg̲áläsaa'uujang
     sg̲ál+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'us
     sg̲ál+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲ál'ujaa
     sg̲ál+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲ál'uujaangaa
     sg̲ál+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲áläsaa'us
     sg̲ál+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sg̲áläsaa'ahlans
     sg̲ál+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sg̲áläseehl
     sg̲ál+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: sg̲ál'uu
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'waa
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'waa
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'waang
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: sg̲ál'wägan
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲ál'aawaa
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: sg̲ál'aawaan
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: sg̲ál'waas
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sg̲ál'aawaas
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲ál'waa.ang
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲ál'aawaa.ang
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲álgang'waa
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲álgang'waang
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲álgang'waa.ang
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲ál'wägiinii
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲ál'wägaangaa
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲ál'wägaangaan
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sg̲ál'waaäsaa
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sg̲ál'waaäs
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sg̲ál'waaäsaang
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sg̲ál'waaäsga
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲ál'waaäsaas
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲ál'waaäsaa.ang
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲ál'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲ál'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲ál'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲ál'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'waa'uuj
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'waa'uujang
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sg̲ál'waaäsaa'uujang
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'waa'us
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲ál'waa'ujaa
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲ál'waa'uujaangaa
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲ál'waaäsaa'us
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sg̲ál'waa'ahlanggang
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: sg̲ál'waa'ahlanggan
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲ál'waa'ahlanggiinii
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sg̲ál'waaäsaa'ahlans
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sg̲ál'waa'ahlans
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: sg̲ál'aawaa'ahlang
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sg̲ál'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sg̲ál'aawaa'ahlanggang
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: sg̲ál'waa'ahl
     sg̲ál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sg̲ál'waaäseehl
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: sg̲ál'ang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'angga
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'ang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'anggang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: sg̲ál'anggan
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲ál'aangaa
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: sg̲ál'aangaan
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: sg̲ál'ans
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sg̲ál'aangaas
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲ál'angang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲ál'aangaa.ang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲ál'anggang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲álgang'anggang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲álgang'angang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲ál'anggiinii
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲ál'anggaangaa
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲ál'anggaangaan
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sg̲ál'angäsaa
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sg̲ál'angäs
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sg̲ál'angäsaang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sg̲ál'angäsga
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲ál'angäsaas
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲ál'angäsaa.ang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲álang k̲asaa'áng
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲álang k̲asaa'ánggang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲álang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲álang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'ang'uuj
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'ang'uujang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sg̲ál'angäsaa'uujang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'ang'us
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲ál'ang'ujaa
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲ál'ang'uujaangaa
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲ál'angäsaa'us
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sg̲ál'aang'ahlanggang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: sg̲ál'aang'ahlanggan
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲ál'aang'ahlanggiinii
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sg̲ál'angäsaa'ahlans
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sg̲ál'aang'ahlans
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: sg̲ál'aangaa'ahlang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sg̲ál'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sg̲ál'aangaa'ahlanggang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: sg̲ál'aang'ahl
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sg̲ál'angäseehl
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: sg̲ál'ang'uu
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'ang'waa
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'ang'waa
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'ang'waang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: sg̲ál'ang'wägan
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲ál'ang'aawaa
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: sg̲ál'ang'aawaan
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: sg̲ál'ang'waas
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sg̲ál'ang'aawaas
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲ál'ang'waa.ang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲ál'ang'aawaa.ang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲álgang'ang'waa
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲álgang'ang'waang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲álgang'ang'waa.ang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲ál'ang'wägiinii
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲ál'ang'wägaangaa
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲ál'ang'wägaangaan
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sg̲ál'ang'waaäsaa
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sg̲ál'ang'waaäs
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sg̲ál'ang'waaäsaang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sg̲ál'ang'waaäsga
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲ál'ang'waaäsaas
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲ál'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲ál'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲ál'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲ál'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲ál'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'ang'waa'uuj
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'ang'waa'uujang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sg̲ál'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sg̲ál'ang'waa'us
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲ál'ang'waa'ujaa
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲ál'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲ál'ang'waaäsaa'us
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sg̲ál'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: sg̲ál'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲ál'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sg̲ál'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sg̲ál'ang'waa'ahlans
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: sg̲ál'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sg̲ál'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sg̲ál'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: sg̲ál'ang'waa'ahl
     sg̲ál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sg̲ál'ang'waaäseehl
